New Jersey, session 222, S1543.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act, 100 percent disabled veteran means any citizen and resident of this State now or hereafter honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States who has been or shall be adjudicated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or its successor, as being 100 percent disabled. b.    The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall, upon proper application therefor, issue 100 Percent Disabled Veteran license plates for any motor vehicle owned or leased and registered in the State by a 100 percent disabled veteran.  In addition to the registration number and other markings or identification otherwise prescribed by law, the license plate shall display the words 100 Percent Disabled Veteran and an appropriate symbol or emblem.  The symbol or emblem shall be chosen by the chief administrator, after consulting with organizations consisting of or representing the interests of 100 percent disabled veterans.  Issuance of 100 Percent Disabled Veteran license plates shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 3 of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes, except as hereinafter otherwise specifically provided. c.     Application for issuance of 100 Percent Disabled Veteran license plates shall be made to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission on forms and in a manner as prescribed by the chief administrator.  There shall be no cost to the applicant for 100 Percent Disabled Veteran license plates. d.    A 100 Percent Disabled Veteran license plate shall entitle the holder to all the benefits, privileges, and considerations afforded the holders of license plates and placards under the provisions of P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-204 et seq.). e.     A 100 Percent Disabled Veteran license plate is not transferable and is exclusively for the use of the person to whom it is duly issued.  The knowing misuse or abuse of any benefit, privilege, or consideration granted to a holder of a 100 Percent Disabled Veteran license plate shall be sufficient cause for the revocation of all benefits, privileges, and considerations afforded to the holder of the 100 Percent Disabled license plate and the forfeiture of the 100 Percent Disabled license plate. f.     The chief administrator shall notify motorists of the availability of 100 Percent Disabled license plates for qualified disabled veterans by including a notice with all motor vehicle registration renewals and by posting appropriate posters or signs in all motor vehicle commission facilities and offices, as may be provided by the motor vehicle commission.  The notices, posters, and signs shall be designed by the chief administrator. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment.  The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may take such anticipatory acts in advance of the date as may be necessary for the timely implementation of this act.